Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-241
Town meeting; minutes; filing.

The minutes of the proceedings of every town meeting shall be filed in the office of the town clerk within ten days after such town meeting.

Laws 1895, c. 28, § 39, p. 143;

R.S.1913, § 1025;

C.S.1922, § 927;

C.S.1929, § 26-241;

R.S.1943, § 23-241;

Laws 1973, LB 75, § 8.